Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Chapter 65 Parking Authority Act
7-65-119. Completion of corporate purpose — Dissolution.

Whenever the board of directors of the authority, by resolution, determines that there has been substantial compliance with the purposes for which the authority was formed, and all bonds theretofore issued and all obligations theretofore incurred by the authority have been fully paid, then the members of the board of directors shall thereupon execute and file for record in the office of the secretary of state a certificate of dissolution reciting such facts and declaring the authority to be dissolved. Such certificate of dissolution shall be executed under the corporate seal of the authority. Upon the filing of such certificate of dissolution, the authority shall stand dissolved, the title to all funds and properties owned by it at the time of such dissolution shall vest in the municipality, and possession of such funds and properties shall forthwith be delivered to such municipality.

Acts 1980, ch. 826, § 19.

7-65-120. Joint operation.

The powers conferred upon authorities created under this chapter may be exercised by two (2) or more such authorities acting jointly. Two (2) or more municipalities may, by acting jointly, incorporate an authority to effectuate the purposes of this chapter. When two (2) or more municipalities incorporate such an authority, each and every requisite pertaining to the application for incorporation, qualifications of applicants, certificate of incorporation and amendment of certificate shall be incumbent, in like manner, upon each municipality joining in the creation of such authority.

Acts 1980, ch. 826, § 20.

7-65-121. Law complete in itself.

No proceedings, notice, filing or approval shall be required for the organization of the authority or the issuance of any bonds or any instrument as security for the bonds, except as provided in this chapter, notwithstanding any other law to the contrary; provided, that nothing in this chapter shall be construed to deprive the state and its governmental subdivisions of their respective police powers over properties of the authority, or to impair any power over the authority of any official or agency of the state and its governmental subdivisions that may be otherwise provided by law.

Acts 1980, ch. 826, § 21.

7-65-122. Project sites.

Any municipality may acquire a project site by gift, purchase, eminent domain or lease, and may transfer any project site to an authority by sale, lease or gift. Such transfer may be authorized by resolution of the governing body of the municipality without submission of the question to the voters, and without regard to the requirements, restrictions, limitations or other provisions contained in any other general, special or local law. Such project site may be within or without the municipality or partially within and partially without the municipality.

Acts 1980, ch. 826, § 22.

7-65-123. Powers additional to those granted by other laws.

The powers conferred by this chapter shall be in addition and supplementary to, and the limitations in this chapter shall not affect the powers conferred by, any other general, special or local law. Projects may be acquired, purchased, constructed, reconstructed, improved, bettered and extended and bonds may be issued under this chapter for such purposes, notwithstanding that any other general, special or local law may provide for the acquisition, purchase, construction, reconstruction, improvement, betterment and extension of a like project, or the issuance of bonds for like purposes, and without regard to the requirements, restrictions, limitations or other provisions contained in any other general, special or local laws.

Acts 1980, ch. 826, § 23.

7-65-124. Applicability of chapter.

This chapter shall only apply to counties having a population of more than fifty thousand (50,000), according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

This chapter shall not apply to counties having a metropolitan form of government.

This chapter shall apply to those counties having a population of six hundred thousand (600,000) or more, according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1980, ch. 826, §§ 25-27; 1981, ch. 454, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.